District of Columbia statutes.
42-3405.13

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or any section, clause, phrase, or word or the application thereof, in any circumstances is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of the chapter and of the application of any other provision, section, sentence, clause, phrase, or word shall not be affected.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 513, 27 DCR 2975
Aug. 1, 1981, D.C. Law 4-27, § 2(h), 28 DCR 2824

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1663.